Arkansas statutes. Title 12 Law Enforcement, Emergency Management, and Military Affairs
Chapter 6

General Provisions

Subchapter 1

— Highway Safety Program Advisory Council

12-6-101, 12-6-102. [Repealed.]

12-6-201, 12-6-202. [Repealed.]

12-6-301. Definitions.

As used in this subchapter:

“Arrest quota” means any requirement regarding the number of arrests made, or the number of citations issued, by a law enforcement officer or the proportion of such arrests made and citations issued by a law enforcement officer relative to the arrests made and citations issued by another law enforcement officer or group of officers; and

“Citation” means a notice to appear, notice of violation, or notice of parking violation.

History.

Acts 1995, No. 952, § 1.

12-6-302. Arrest quotas prohibited.

No state or local agency employing law enforcement officers engaged in the enforcement of any motor vehicle traffic laws of this state or any local ordinance governing motor vehicle traffic may establish any policy requiring any law enforcement officer to meet an arrest quota, except as necessary to meet requirements under federal law or contracts with federal agencies.

History.

Acts 1995, No. 952, § 2.

12-6-303. Use of number of arrests.

No state or local agency employing law enforcement officers engaged in the enforcement of any motor vehicle traffic laws may use the number of arrests or citations issued by a law enforcement officer as the sole criterion for promotion, demotion, or dismissal, or the earning of any benefit provided by the agency.

Any such arrests or citations and their ultimate dispositions may only be considered in evaluating the overall performance of a law enforcement officer.

History.

Acts 1995, No. 952, § 3.

Subchapter 4

— Patrol Vehicles

12-6-401. Smoking in patrol vehicles prohibited.

Each county sheriff's office and police department of a municipality may designate a proportionate number of its patrol vehicles as “nonsmoking” vehicles and shall not allow smoking of tobacco products in those vehicles.

History.

Acts 2001, No. 1392, § 1.

12-6-402. Civilian passengers.

Each law enforcement agency of the state shall establish a policy prohibiting civilian passengers in patrol vehicles unless specific written approval is given for each civilian passenger by the chief law enforcement officer or his or her designee.

History.

Acts 2013, No. 1183, § 1.

Subchapter 5

— State Law Enforcement Agencies

Effective Dates. Acts 2015, No. 100, § 2: Feb. 18, 2015. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by theGeneral Assembly of the State of Arkansas that law enforcement officers risk their lives every day in the course of their employment; that the state values the dedication and efforts of these law enforcement officers; that the safety and well-being of Arkansas citizens depend on the ability and willingness of men and women to serve in state law enforcement agencies; and that this act is immediately necessary because it is in the state's best interests to do everything possible to encourage and recognize service in state law enforcement agencies without delay. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

12-6-501. Award of flags — Definitions.

As used in this section:

“In the course of employment” means at any time when a law enforcement officer is on duty as a law enforcement officer or is performing an act ordinarily performed by a law enforcement officer although the law enforcement officer is not actually on duty at the time;

“Law enforcement officer” means a public servant employed by a state law enforcement agency and vested by law with a duty to maintain order or to make arrests for offenses; and

“State law enforcement agency” means a state agency that is responsible for enforcing the criminal laws, traffic laws, highway laws, or game and fish laws of this state.

A state law enforcement agency may award one (1) United States flag to the family of a law enforcement officer who lost his or her life in the course of employment with the state law enforcement agency.

As used in this subsection, “family” means “family” as defined in the rules or procedures of the state law enforcement agency.

A local criminal justice coordinating committee may be created under this section and shall:

Periodically review data and records of local and regional detention facilities collected under § 12-12-219 and data concerning a local crisis intervention team and crisis stabilization unit, when applicable;

Assist in the access and transfer of data described under subdivision (c)(1) of this section; and

Recommend protocols for the efficient and effective use of local criminal justice resources, and a crisis intervention team or crisis stabilization unit, when applicable.

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, No. 531, § 3: Mar. 20, 2017. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that it is of public interest to protect the privacy of the family members of a deceased law enforcement officer; that currently, there are no safeguards or procedures in place to ensure that a recording that depicts the death of a law enforcement officer is released in a proper, respectful, and authorized manner; and that this act is immediately necessary because it provides a balanced procedure to achieve proper release of a video or audio recording that depicts a law enforcement officer's death while taking into account the privacy belonging to the family members of the deceased law enforcement officer. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

“Family member” means a spouse, biological or adopted child, parent, or sibling of the deceased law enforcement officer;

“Law enforcement officer” means a person vested by law with a duty to maintain public order and to make arrests for offenses;

“Notice” means that from all the facts and circumstances known to the person at the time, the person has reason to know that the facts and circumstances exist.

Notice may be communicated in person or through other means, including without limitation, by telephone, telegraph, teletype, telecopier, facsimile, or other form of wire or wireless communication, or by mail or private carrier; and

“Record” means a photograph, video recording, or audio recording, including any audio or video footage captured on a body-worn camera or a dashboard camera.

A minor child of a deceased law enforcement officer who is at least fourteen (14) years of age may access a record described in subdivision (b)(1) of this section if the parent or guardian of the child:

Provides written consent to the custodian of the record to permit the child to access a record; and

Is present to provide supervision over the child as he or she accesses a record.

(1)The custodian of a record shall not permit a person not authorized under this section to copy, disseminate, reproduce, transmit, or access a record described in subdivision (b)(1) of this section.

A person or entity may petition a circuit court in the county where a record described in subdivision (b)(1) of this section is physically located in order to obtain access to the record.

At a hearing held on a petition filed with the circuit court under subdivision (d)(1)(A) of this section seeking access to a record described in subdivision (b)(1) of this section, any review of a record described in subdivision (b)(1) of this section shall be conducted in camera.

Upon a showing of good cause, a circuit court may issue an order authorizing a person or entity under subdivision (d)(1) of this section to access a record described in subdivision (b)(1) of this section and may prescribe restrictions or stipulations pertaining to the access of the record that the circuit court deems appropriate, including whether to allow for the copying or public disclosure of a record described in subdivision (b)(1) of this section.

In determining good cause under subdivision (d)(2) of this section, the circuit court shall consider the following factors, along with other factors that the circuit court may deem relevant:

Whether access to the record described in subdivision (b)(1) of this section is necessary for the public evaluation of a law enforcement officer's conduct during the performance of his or her official duties;

Whether there is a compelling public interest in the disclosure of the record;

The seriousness of the intrusion into the privacy of the deceased law enforcement officer's family members; and

The availability of similar information in other forms.

A custodian of a record described in subdivision (b)(1) of this section shall be given notice of:

A petition filed with a circuit court to access a record described in subdivision (b)(1) of this section; and

The opportunity to be present and heard at any hearing on the matter.

In addition to custodian notification under subdivision (d)(4)(A) of this section, the following people shall be provided notice described in subdivisions (d)(4)(A)(i) and (d)(4)(A)(ii) of this section:

The surviving spouse of the deceased law enforcement officer, if any;

If the deceased law enforcement officer has no surviving spouse, the parents of the deceased law enforcement officer, if any; or

If the deceased law enforcement officer has no surviving parents and no surviving spouse, the adult children of the deceased law enforcement officer.

This section does not:

Prohibit a judge, jury, attorney, court personnel, or other persons necessary to a criminal, civil, or administrative proceeding involving the death of a law enforcement officer from viewing a record described in subdivision (b)(1) of this section;

Overturn, abrogate, or alter a court order that exists on March 20, 2017, that restricts, limits, or grants access to a record described in subdivision (b)(1) of this section;

Prohibit a law enforcement agency involved in an official investigation of a death of a law enforcement officer, including without limitation, the law enforcement agency by whom the deceased law enforcement officer was employed at the time of his or her death, the Division of Arkansas State Police, and the Federal Bureau of Investigation, from obtaining a record described in subdivision (b)(1) of this section for the purpose of conducting an official investigation pertaining to the death of a law enforcement officer.

However, a record used during an official investigation under subdivision (e)(3)(A)(i) of this section shall not be reproduced, transmitted, or disseminated for any purpose not authorized under this section.

This section does not prohibit the law enforcement agency by whom the deceased law enforcement officer was employed from using a record described in subdivision (b)(1) of this section for law enforcement officer training or internal review.

However, a record used for the purpose of law enforcement officer training or internal review under subdivision (e)(3)(B)(i) of this section shall not be reproduced, transmitted, or disseminated for any purpose not authorized under this section.

This section does not prohibit the use of a record described in subdivision (b)(1) of this section for law enforcement officer training conducted by an entity authorized to conduct law enforcement training, including without limitation:

The Black River Technical College Law Enforcement Training Academy;

The Criminal Justice Institute;

The Arkansas Law Enforcement Training Academy; or

Other law enforcement officer training programs.

However, a record used for law enforcement officer training purposes under subdivision (e)(3)(C)(i) of this section shall not be reproduced, transmitted, or disseminated for any purpose not authorized under this section; or

Prohibit a prosecuting attorney, deputy prosecuting attorney, defense counsel pursuant to a motion of discovery, their staff, or attorneys involved in civil litigation involving the death of a law enforcement officer from accessing or copying a record described in subdivision (b)(1) of this section.

A record accessed or copied under subdivision (e)(4)(A) of this section shall not be reproduced, transmitted, or disseminated for any purpose not authorized under this section.

A.C.R.C. Notes. Acts 2017, No. 531, § 1, provided: “Legislative findings and determinations.

The General Assembly finds and determines that:

“(1)The nature of a profession in law enforcement is inherently dangerous, with law enforcement officers frequently facing life threatening situations;

“(2)During the course of his or her duties, a law enforcement officer routinely relies on audio and video recording devices to record his or her movements and actions;

“(3)Due to the inherently dangerous nature of a profession in law enforcement, a law enforcement officer's death that occurs in the line of duty is likely to be captured and depicted on an audio or video recording device;

“(4)Absent a compelling public interest, or the necessity to evaluate a law enforcement officer's conduct, or an official purpose such as a criminal, civil, or administrative proceeding or an official investigation into a law enforcement officer's death, the disclosure of an audio or visual depiction of the death of a law enforcement officer would have little value to the public other than to satisfy a morbid curiosity concerning the death of a law enforcement officer;

“(5)Presently, there are audio and video recordings that depict the death of a law enforcement officer available in various public forums for viewing and sharing which have the potential to encourage copycat acts of violence against law enforcement officers and to incite other acts of violence against law enforcement officers, and which also subject the surviving family members of the deceased law enforcement officer to viewing the murder or death of their family member on television, internet, social media, and other publically accessible forums — causing the surviving family members to relive the pain associated with the death and allowing the public to view and publically share with others sensitive depictions of the final moments and death of their family member — thereby invading the privacy of the deceased law enforcement officer's family; and

“(6)It is the intent of this act to:

“(A)Protect the privacy belonging to family members of a deceased law enforcement officer; and

“(B)Discourage copycat acts of violence or other similar forms of violence against law enforcement officers.”

Publisher's Notes. This chapter was repealed by Acts 1991, No. 343, § 2. The chapter was derived from the following sources:

12-7-101. Acts 1977, No. 558, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 6-1301.

12-7-102. Acts 1977, No. 558, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 6-1302.

12-7-103. Acts 1977, No. 558, § 3; A.S.A. 1947, § 6-1303.

12-7-104. Acts 1977, No. 558, § 4; A.S.A. 1947, § 6-1304.

12-7-105. Acts 1977, No. 558, § 5; A.S.A. 1947, § 6-1305.